Hawaii statutes.
[§431:30-103] Establishment of the
commission and venue. (a) The compacting states hereby create and
establish a joint public entity known as the interstate insurance product
regulation commission. Pursuant to section 431:30-112, the commission may develop
uniform standards for product lines, receive and provide prompt review of
products filed therewith, and give approval to those product filings satisfying
applicable uniform standards; provided it is not intended that the commission
be the exclusive entity for receipt and review of insurance product filings.
Nothing herein shall prohibit any insurer from filing its product in any state
wherein the insurer is licensed to conduct the business of insurance, and any
such filing shall be subject to the laws of the state where filed.

(b) The commission is a body corporate and
politic and an instrumentality of the compacting states.

(c) The commission is solely responsible for
its liabilities except as otherwise specifically provided in this compact.

(d) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings
by or against the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court
of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is
located. [L 2004, c 104, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next